Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1902.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The department of transportation, in consultation with the department of ecology, shall convene a work group to develop recommendations to streamline the permitting of transportation projects, by aligning priorities, legal requirements, timelines, processing, and interests, in permitting. The work group shall designate the entity or entities responsible for the implementation of each recommendation, including the entity primarily responsible for the implementation of each recommendation.(2) The work group shall consist of the following members:(a) One representative from the department of transportation, to be appointed by the secretary of the department;(b) One representative from the department of ecology, to be appointed by the director of the department;(c) One representative from the department of fish and wildlife, to be appointed by the director of the department;(d) One representative from the department of commerce, to be appointed by the director of the department;(e) One representative from the office of equity, to be appointed by the director of the office;(f) One representative from the association of Washington cities;(g) One representative from the Washington state association of counties;(h) One representative from the Washington public ports association;(i) One representative from an organization representing general contractors;(j) One representative from a statewide organization representing construction trades labor;(k) One representative from the Washington state transit association;(l) One representative from the United States army corps of engineers, to be invited by the secretary of the department of transportation;(m) One representative of the consultant engineering community; and(n) At least one, but not limited to, representative from tribes, and additional coordination from the governor's office of Indian affairs.(3) The work group shall develop recommendations to reduce project costs and the time required from project conception to project completion. These recommendations must ensure that all appropriate environmental and regulatory protections are maintained.(4) Staff support to the work group must be provided by the department of transportation.(5) The work group shall convene its first meeting by October 1, 2025, and shall submit an interim report to the legislature by January 1, 2026, outlining its work to date, along with information on any permits or processes the work group may focus on during the course of their work, and a final report to the legislature detailing its work and any recommendations, including any recommendations for legislation, by November 1, 2026.(6) This section expires December 31, 2026.--- END ---